Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1586.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 314.1. Tax Paid on Overtime Wages.--(a) A taxpayer shall be entitled to a tax credit against the tax otherwise due under this article equal to the amount of income which is in the form of overtime wages multiplied by the tax rate under section 302.(b) A taxpayer shall calculate the amount of taxes paid on 12345678910111213141516171819202122 any overtime wages using the information furnished by the employer pursuant to 34 Pa. Code § 231.36 (relating to statement to employee).(c) The tax credit shall be equal to one hundred per cent of any taxes paid pursuant to this article on overtime wages. If a taxpayer has received any tax forgiveness under section 304, that amount shall be deducted from the total amount of the tax credit.(d) The tax credit shall be fully refundable.(e) The tax credit may not exceed the proportion of the tax otherwise due under this article.(f) The Department of Revenue shall incorporate the filing of the tax credit into the standard PA 40 form.(g) A taxpayer applying for a tax credit shall provide the department with a copy of the taxpayer's paperwork under 34 Pa. Code § 231.36 as proof of credit amount.(h) As used in this section:"Overtime wages" means wages received by an employe which are required to be paid at least one and one-half times the employe's regular wage under section 4(c) of the act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as "The Minimum Wage Act of 1968.""Tax credit" means the tax credit authorized under this section.Section 2. This act shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1586PN1887 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627